Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE C. RULES OF THE ROAD

CHAPTER 600. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 600.001. REMOVING MATERIAL FROM HIGHWAY. (a) A person who drops or permits to be dropped or thrown on a highway destructive or injurious material shall immediately remove the material or cause it to be removed.

(b) A person who removes a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove glass or another injurious substance dropped on the highway from the vehicle.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 600.002. IDENTIFICATION REQUIRED FOR VEHICLE NEAR MEXICAN BORDER. On demand of a peace officer within 250 feet of the Mexican border at a checkpoint authorized by Section 411.0095, Government Code, as added by Chapter 497, Acts of the 73rd Legislature, Regular Session, 1993, the driver of a vehicle shall produce a driver's license and proof of compliance with Chapter 601.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 600.003. ENFORCEMENT OF CERTAIN TRAFFIC LAWS BY PRIVATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. (a) In this section, "private or independent institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003(15), Education Code.

(b) A private or independent institution of higher education may enforce a traffic law of this state under Chapter 545 restricting or prohibiting the operation or movement of vehicles on a road of the institution if:

(1) the road of the institution is open to the public at the time the traffic law is enforced;

(2) the governing body of the institution adopts a regulation to enforce the traffic law; and

(3) the restriction or prohibition on the operation and movement of vehicles adopted by the institution:

(A) is posted by means of a sign, marking, signal, or other device visible to and, if it contains writing, able to be read by an operator of a vehicle to whom the restriction or prohibition applies in the same manner as a similar restriction or prohibition on the operation and movement of vehicles would be posted by a municipality; and

(B) has been approved by:

(i) the commissioners court of the county in which the applicable road of the institution is located, if the road is located in the unincorporated area of a county; or

(ii) the governing body of the municipality in which the applicable road of the institution is located, if the road is located in a municipality.

(c) Campus security personnel of the institution commissioned under Section 51.212, Education Code, are authorized to enforce the provisions of this section and have the authority to issue and use traffic tickets and summons in a form prescribed by the Texas Department of Public Safety to enforce this chapter only on the property of the institution that commissioned the campus security personnel under Section 51.212, Education Code.

(d) The same procedures that apply to a traffic ticket or summons by a commissioned peace officer of an institution of higher education under Sections 51.206 and 51.210, Education Code, also apply to a ticket or summons issued under this section.

(e) The governing body of the municipality or the commissioners court of the county that approves the enforcement of traffic laws under Subsection (b) shall also determine the disposition of funds collected under this section from any fees or fines from the enforcement of a traffic law of this state.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 620, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 600.004. TRAINING OF SCHOOL CROSSING GUARD. (a) A local authority may authorize a school crossing guard to direct traffic in a school crossing zone if the guard successfully completes a training program in traffic direction as defined by the basic peace officer course curriculum established by the Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Education.

(b) A school crossing guard trained under this section:

(1) is not a peace officer; and

(2) may not carry a weapon while directing traffic in a school crossing zone.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 724, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.